Illinois, session 104th, HB5612.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Finance Act is amended by adding 5Section 5.1038 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 105/5.1038 new)7    Sec. 5.1038. The Education Property Tax Relief Fund. 8    Section 10. The School Code is amended by adding Section 92-3.214 as follows: 10    (105 ILCS 5/2-3.214 new)11    Sec. 2-3.214. School district property tax relief grant 12program.13    (a) As used in this Section: 14    "Adjusted maximum aggregate property tax extension" means 15the highest aggregate property tax extension that a school 16district is authorized by law to levy, without regard to this 17Section, for the taxable year for which the adjusted maximum 18aggregate property tax extension is calculated, minus the 19grant amount received by the school district for the fiscal 20year that ends during the taxable year for which the adjusted 21maximum aggregate property tax extension is calculated.   HB5612- 2 -LRB104 20415 HLH 33879 b1    "Aggregate property tax extension" means the annual 2corporate extension for the school district and those special 3purpose extensions that are made annually for a school 4district. 5    "Taxable year" means the calendar year during which 6property taxes payable in the next succeeding year are levied. 7    (b) For State fiscal year 2030 and each State fiscal year 8thereafter, the State Board of Education shall establish and 9administer a program to award property tax relief grants to 10school districts in this State. In exchange for receiving a 11grant under this Section, a school district's maximum 12aggregate property tax extension for the taxable year that 13begins on January 1 of the fiscal year for which the grant is 14awarded may not exceed its adjusted maximum aggregate property 15tax extension for that taxable year. Grants shall be awarded 16from moneys appropriated for that purpose from the Education 17Property Tax Relief Fund created in subsection (c). Moneys 18awarded to school districts under this Section shall be 19distributed pro rata on a per-pupil average daily attendance 20basis, as reported in the school district report card for the 21immediately preceding school year under Section 10-17a. 22    (c) The Education Property Tax Relief Fund is created as a 23special fund in the State treasury. By September 1, 2030, and 24by September 1 of each year thereafter, the Governor's Office 25of Management and Budget shall certify to the State 26Comptroller and the State Treasurer an amount equal to   HB5612- 3 -LRB104 20415 HLH 33879 b1$600,000,000 in each of the State fiscal years 2030 through 22033 and $1,700,000,000 in fiscal year 2034 and every fiscal 3year thereafter. Upon receiving the certified amount from the 4Governor's Office of Management and Budget, the State 5Comptroller shall order transferred and the State Treasurer 6shall transfer the certified amount from the General Revenue 7Fund to the Education Property Tax Relief Fund. Any unexpended 8amounts remaining in the Education Property Tax Relief Fund on 9the last day of the fiscal year shall be transferred from the 10Education Property Tax Relief Fund to the General Revenue 11Fund.